Montana, session 2025, HB753.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 20-7-120, MCA, is amended to read:
"20-7-120. Human sexuality instruction -- Excused excused absences from curriculum
requirements -- notice -- prohibited activities. (1) A parent, guardian, or other person who is responsible for
the care of a child may refuse to allow the child to attend or withdraw the child from a course of instruction, a
class period, an assembly, an organized school function, or instruction provided by the district through its staff
or guests invited at the request of the district regarding human sexuality instruction. The withdrawal or refusal to
attend is an excused absence pursuant to 20-5-103.
(2) A school district offering human sexuality instruction shall ensure that the instruction includes at
least one visual image of a dilation and evacuation abortion that is performed between 20 and 25 weeks of
gestation.
(2)(3) Any A school implementing or maintaining a curriculum, providing materials, or holding an
event or assembly at which the district provides human sexuality instruction, whether introduced by school
educators, administrators, or officials or by guests invited at the request of the school, shall adopt a policy
ensuring parental or guardian notification no less than 48 hours prior to holding an event or assembly or
introducing materials for instructional use.
(3)(4) A school district shall annually notify the parent or guardian of each student scheduled to be
enrolled in human sexuality instruction in the district or school in advance of the instruction of:
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 753

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 753.1
(a) the basic content of the district's or school's human sexuality instruction intended to be taught
to the student; and
(b) the parent's or guardian's right to withdraw the student from the district's or school's human
sexuality instruction.
(4)(5) A school district shall make all curriculum materials used in the district's or school's human
sexuality instruction available for public inspection prior to the use of the materials in actual instruction.
(5)(6) A school district or its personnel or agents may not permit a person, entity, or any affiliate or
agent of the person or entity to offer, sponsor, or furnish in any manner any course materials or instruction
relating to human sexuality or sexually transmitted diseases to its students or personnel if the person, entity, or
any affiliate or agent of the person or entity is a provider of abortion services.
(6)(7) For purposes of this section, "human sexuality instruction" means teaching or otherwise
providing information about human sexuality, including intimate relationships, human sexual anatomy, sexual
reproduction, sexually transmitted infections, sexual acts, sexual orientation, gender identity, abstinence,
contraception, or reproductive rights and responsibilities."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 753